Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the New Hire Reporting Act:

(1) Date of hire means the day an employee begins employment
with an employer;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Employee means an independent contractor or a person
who is compensated by or receives income from an employer or other payor,
regardless of how such income is denominated;

(4) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, or department
or agency of the state or federal government, labor organization, or any other
entity with an employee;

(5) Income means compensation paid, payable, due, or to be
due for labor or personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary,
earnings, income, commission, bonus, or otherwise;

(6) Payor includes a person, partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or
other entity doing business or authorized to do business in the State of Nebraska,
including a financial institution, or a department or an agency of state,
county, or city government; and

(7) Rehire means the first day an employee begins employment
with the employer following a termination of employment with such employer.
Termination of employment does not include temporary separations from employment,
such as an unpaid medical leave, an unpaid leave of absence, a temporary layoff,
or an absence for disability or maternity.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 41;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 16.